District of Columbia statutes.
42-3405.07

Revocation.

(a)

A certificate issued pursuant to § 42-3402.02(a), an exemption issued pursuant to § 42-3402.02(b) or § 42-3402.10, or registration required pursuant to § 42-3404.11 may be revoked after notice and hearing upon a written finding of fact that the holder of the certificate, the holder of the exemption, or the registrant has:

(1)

Failed to comply with the terms of a cease and desist order;

(2)

Failed faithfully to perform any stipulation or agreement made with the Mayor as an inducement to grant any certificate, exemption, or registration; or

(3)

Made intentional misrepresentations or concealed material facts in an application for a certificate, exemption, or registration.

(b)

If the Mayor finds after notice and hearing that the holder of a certificate, the holder of an exemption, or the registrant has been guilty of a violation for which revocation could be ordered, the Mayor may issue a cease and desist order; or, upon adjudication for any infraction thereof, impose civil fines, penalties, and fees as alternative sanctions, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 507, 27 DCR 2975
Aug. 1, 1981, D.C. Law 4-27, § 2(i), 28 DCR 2824
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 410(b), 32 DCR 4450
This section is referenced in § 42-3405.08.
1981 Ed., § 45-1657.
Reenactment of Law 3-86: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3401.01.